dictsource/krm_rules
// translation rules for Tatar (Romania, Dobrudja Region)
// This file is UTF8 encoded

// Stress rule: Right-most vowel, but stop before the vowel which is
// marked as unstressed [%].

// Vowels
.L01 ı a o u e i ĭ ö ü

// Consonants
.L02 b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p q r s ş t v w y z

.group a
        a         a
        a (_     'a
        a (L02_  'a
        ay (_    'aI
        ay (L02_ 'aI
        
.group b
        b         b
        
.group c
        c        DZ
        cc       DZ:
        
.group ç
        ç        TS
        çç       TS:
        
.group d
        d        d
        dd       d:
        
.group e
        e        e
        e (_    'e
        e (L02_ 'e
        
.group f
        f        f
        
.group g
        g        g
        gg       g:
        
.group ğ
        ğ        Q
         
.group h         
        h        h

.group ı
        ı        @
        ı (_    '@
        ı (L02_ '@

.group i
        i        i
        i  (_   'i
        ı (L02_ 'i
        
.group ĭ
        ĭ        @
        ı (_    '@
        ı (L02_ '@  
        
.group j
        j        Z
        
.group k
        k        k
        kk       k:
        
.group l
        l        l
        
.group m
        m        m
        
.group n
        n        n

.group ñ
        ñ        N
        
.group o
        o        o
        o (_    'o
        o (L02_ 'o
        
.group ö
        ö        O
        ö (_    'O
        ö (L02_ 'O
        
.group p
        p        p
        pp       p:
        
.group q
        q        q
        qq       q:
        
.group r
        r        R
        
.group s
        s        s
        sın  (_  %s@n
        sĭn  (_  %s@n
        
.group t
        t        t
        tt       t:
        
.group u
        u        u
        u (_    'u
        u (L02_ 'u

.group ü
        ü        U
        ü (_    'U
        ü (L02_ 'U
        
.group v
        v       v
        
.group w
        w       w2
        
.group y
        y       j
        
.group z
        z       z        
